Idaho statutes. Title 43 IRRIGATION DISTRICTS
Chapter 7
LEVY AND COLLECTION OF ASSESSMENTS

Sec.

43-701DD. Flat rate assessments — Collection by district.

§ 43-701. Preparation of assessment book — Levy of assessments.

The secretary of the board of directors shall be the assessor of the district, and on or before August 1 of each year shall prepare an assessment book containing a full and accurate list and description of all of the land of the district, and a list of the persons who own, claim or have in possession or control thereof during said year, giving the number of acres listed to each person: provided, that where the property to be listed is described by metes and bounds description, the assessor of the district may give to each tract of land within the district which is described by metes and bounds description an irrigation district assessment number, which number shall be placed on the assessment roll to indicate the certain piece of land bearing such number, and entered on a plat book to indicate what tract is designated by such irrigation district assessment number, and no further description of such land shall be necessary upon the irrigation district assessment roll. The assessor of the district must, in the event irrigation district assessment numbers are used in lieu of the metes and bounds description, on or before the first day of August of each year, file with the board of directors of the district an accurate and complete list of all irrigation district assessment numbers entered on the assessment rolls for the year, showing opposite each number an accurate description of the tract of land designated by such number. Thereafter, in all cases where an irrigation district assessment number is used to designate the same tract of land in the assessment of succeeding year, the assessor of the district shall not include such number in his list of the irrigation district assessment numbers filed with the board of directors of the district.

Whenever a tract of land which has been given an irrigation district assessment number is subdivided, the assessor of the district shall give each subdivision a new irrigation district assessment number, which number with an accurate description of the tract of land designated by such new number, shall be included in his list of irrigation district assessment numbers filed with the board of directors; provided, that the owners of two (2) or more lots each of which is less than five (5) acres in size in any subdivision which has been given new assessment numbers may request of the assessor in writing that those lots be combined for assessment purposes, whereupon the assessor shall combine those lots into a single assessment number, which may be the same as the number previously assigned to one (1) of the lots, which number with an accurate description of the lots designated by such number shall be included in his list of irrigation district assessment numbers filed with the board of directors; thereafter, such combined area shall be deemed to be a single parcel for all purposes related to the levy and collection of assessments and all subsequent assessments shall constitute a single lien against the entire combined area. The request to combine the parcels for assessment purposes shall include the name and mailing address of the person designated by the requesting landowners to receive notices from the district. All assessment notices which otherwise would be sent to the individual landowners, shall be sent to the person thus designated, and shall be deemed to have been sent to the owner of each parcel included in the combined area.
(3) In all irrigation districts where the collection of assessments is made by county officers as provided for by sections 43-727, 43-728 and 43-729, Idaho Code, said assessment book shall be prepared on or before June fifteenth of each year and the provisions of this section with reference to assessment numbers shall not apply. If the name of the person owning, claiming, possessing or controlling any tract of said land is not known, it shall be listed to unknown owners.

In all districts in which an assessment is levied for the purpose of maintaining and operating the works of said district, at a regular meeting of the board between August 1 and November 8 of each year, the board of directors shall levy an assessment upon all the lands of the district for the expense of maintaining and operating the property of the district; provided, that in all districts where the collection of assessments is made by county officers as provided by sections 43-727, 43-729, Idaho Code, said levy shall be made on or before the third Tuesday of July of each year.

(4) At the time of meeting of the board of directors to levy assessments as in this section provided, the board of directors of the irrigation district are authorized to determine the aggregate amount necessary to be raised for all purposes connected with the maintaining and operating of the works of said district, and may determine the total amount of said sum necessary and required to pay the expense of making the assessment book and extension of the assessments thereon, giving notice of assessments and making collections of assessments, which shall be designated as assessment expense fund. If the district has adopted a flat rate method of assessing residential lots of one (1) acre or less as authorized by section 43-701B, Idaho Code, the share of the assessment expense to be apportioned against the residential lots and the share to be apportioned against the tracts of land assessed by the regular method shall be determined separately so as to allocate as accurately as reasonably possible, between (1) such residential lots and (2) all other parcels, the assessment expenses specified above. The balance of said amount necessary to be raised shall be designated as operation and maintenance fund. The board of directors are authorized to apportion the total amount of assessment expense fund against the several tracts of land as shown on the assessment book, so that each tract shall pay its proportionate share of the cost of making assessments and collections thereof. The amount of said assessment designated operation and maintenance fund shall be spread upon all the lands in the district and shall be proportionate to the benefits received by such lands growing out of the maintenance and operation of the said works of said district. Such assessments shall be carried out by the secretary and entered into an appropriate column on the assessment roll immediately and shall be subject to review by the board of correction hereinafter provided for.

§ 43-701A. Rehabilitation of irrigation works — Levy for preliminary study costs.

If the rehabilitation, reconstruction or replacement of irrigation works is determined necessary by the board of directors and a bond issue authorized by section 43-401A, Idaho Code, or other financing arrangement will be required for the project, the board of a district constructing the works or a district which will pay a proportionate share of the cost of the project may include in its assessment levy under section 43-701, Idaho Code, an amount sufficient to obtain surveys, examinations, plans and professional services necessary to determine the cost or feasibility of the project, or obtain its authorization. If other water user organizations contract with the constructing district for payment of a share of the costs of the project, sums expended by the constructing district or others as herein authorized may be included in total project cost; provided that if the monies so assessed and expended by the constructing district or other participating district are repaid, the district may (i) use the money to meet and offset future expenses or assessments of the district, and/or (ii) refund part or all of said money as an adjustment to the original assessment to the present landowners of the district in proportion to the previous assessments from which said money was obtained; provided further that in the event a district is a nonoperating entity, said district may refund part or all as above provided to the irrigation entities that comprise said district in proportion to the previous assessments to landowners within such irrigation entities levied against the lands of said irrigation entities.

§ 43-701B. Flat rate assessments for tracts of one acre or less.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 43-701, Idaho Code, whenever the cost of making and collecting assessments against residential tracts, one (1) acre or less in size, is determined by the board of directors to be burdensome on the district and on the owners of such lots, the board may assess all such tracts at a flat rate, to be determined by dividing the total amount assessable against all such tracts by the total number of such tracts, and the flat rate assessments thus determined may be certified to the county officers as specified in section 43-701C, Idaho Code, for collection or may be collected by the district in substantially the same manner that other assessments are collected pursuant to this chapter. The board, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, may establish the maximum lot size for flat rate assessments at any size within the range between one-fourth (¼) acre and one (1) acre. Tracts included or retained in an irrigation district for drainage purposes only shall be assessed only for drainage costs and may be certified to the county officers on a separate list. The board may, in its discretion, exclude from the flat rate assessment procedure any tracts upon which liens for construction costs exist under the provisions of sections 43-328 through and including 43-330, Idaho Code.

§ 43-701C. Flat rate assessments — Preparation and certification of lists — Changes in legal descriptions.

As soon as possible after the board of directors determines to make flat rate assessments as provided in section 43-701B, Idaho Code, the treasurer of the district shall prepare a list containing the legal description, the assessor’s parcel number and the name and last known address of the owner of record of each residential tract, one (1) acre or less in size, assessed by the district for all purposes, and a separate list in like manner for such tracts assessed only for drainage. The list or lists may be certified by the treasurer to the county auditor of the county in which the lands are situate. When an irrigation district includes lands in more than one (1) county, separate lists may be prepared for each county. When a tract lies partly in one (1) county and partly in one or more other counties, only the portion in any county shall be included in the list for that county if the treasurer is certifying a list or lists to the county auditor. If the legal description of any tract or tracts on any such list differs from the legal description as shown by the assessor’s records, the auditor shall notify the irrigation district treasurer of the discrepancy and the description in the list shall be changed by the irrigation district treasurer, by an addendum, to conform with the assessor’s records; provided, however, that where the discrepancy between the descriptions occurs because a portion of the parcel lies outside the boundaries of the irrigation district, no change in description shall be required, and the irrigation district assessments shall be effective only as to the portions of any such parcel that are within the boundaries of the irrigation district.

§ 43-701D. Flat rate assessments — Collection by county officers.

After any list of tracts has been certified and conformed as provided for in section 43-701C, Idaho Code, the treasurer of the district may notify the appropriate county officers, on or before the third Tuesday of July of each year, of the amount assessed against the tracts identified on each such list, and the amount assessed shall be uniform for all tracts on the same list. After the receipt of any such notification from the treasurer of any irrigation district, the appropriate county officer shall each year enter upon the county assessment roll against the property therein described the levy so made by the board of directors of said district as shown upon the notification furnished to the said county officer as above provided, in manner similar to that in which other municipal, school or highway district assessments are entered by him on said assessment roll, except that the sum assessed and charged against each description of land therein contained for such irrigation district purposes shall be entered by the officer as the operation and maintenance assessment or the drainage assessment of the (name of district) irrigation district against the same. Such district operation and maintenance tax shall be collected and accounted for by the county officers in the same manner as other municipal taxes and paid over to the district treasurer together with any penalties or interest collected thereon, and the collection thereof shall be enforced in the same manner, and neglect to pay the same shall be subject to the same penalties as the other taxes of the county; provided, however, that the collection of such district assessments by such county officers, as herein provided, shall not make the bonds, contracts and interest due from such irrigation districts the obligation of such county or counties.

§ 43-701E. Flat rate assessments — Special handling of unpaid assessments on property exempt from general taxation.

Any irrigation district assessment certified by the treasurer to the county officers which is placed on property exempt from general ad valorem taxation may be returned to the irrigation district if the assessment is not paid within three (3) years of the date on which it is due, and upon return of any such assessment the district shall be responsible for collection thereof, and the county officers shall be relieved of any further responsibility for collection of that assessment. Entry of delinquent assessments and the penalties thereon by the tax collector in accordance with chapter 10, title 63, Idaho Code, shall constitute compliance with the provisions of sections 43-710 and 43-711, Idaho Code, and the treasurer of the district shall not be required to make any separate delinquency entry with respect to any parcel of property to which this section applies.

§ 43-701F. Flat rate assessments — Assessment and collection expenses.

The costs incurred by the irrigation district in preparing and certifying any list of tracts as provided for in section 43-701C, Idaho Code, shall be assessed against the tracts described in that list, at the same amount for each tract, and the amount so assessed shall be included in the first notification made by the irrigation district treasurer to the county as provided for in section 43-701D, Idaho Code, if the district is utilizing the county for collecting the assessment. Thereafter all tracts on any one list shall be regarded as a single tract for determining assessment expense as provided for in section 43-701, Idaho Code. The county commissioners initially shall levy an additional fee against the tracts described in any such list for the cost of transferring and conforming the list and initiating the collection process, at a uniform amount for each tract, and may levy annually an additional assessment for the current cost of collection and remittance to the district, at a uniform amount for each tract.

§ 43-701G. Flat rate assessments — Accelerated collection of indebtedness.

In order to implement the flat rate assessments authorized in section 43-701B, Idaho Code, the board of directors, before any list of tracts is certified to the county officers as provided for in section 43-701C, Idaho Code, or before the list is used by the district for collection of flat rate assessments utilizing its own personnel and procedures, shall assess, against all tracts it has determined to assess at a flat rate as in this chapter provided, the entire unpaid balance of principal and any accrued interest on any contract or bonded indebtedness apportioned to each such tract. If any landowner shall object to such assessment, his tract of land shall not be included in the list certified to the county officers, and that tract shall be assessed by the district in the regular manner for all purposes, instead of under the flat rate procedure authorized in this chapter.

§ 43-701H. Flat rate assessments — Water rights not affected.

Conversion by an irrigation district to the flat rate assessment procedure authorized in this chapter shall not affect in any manner the water rights appurtenant to or allocated to any tract of land in the irrigation district.

§ 43-701I. Recharge projects — Levy for preliminary study costs — Purchase or lease of water.

If a ground water recharge project within all or part of the district is or may be deemed necessary by the board of directors of an irrigation district and a bond issue or other method of financing the project will be required, the board of directors may levy an assessment pursuant to section 43-701, Idaho Code, proportionate to the benefits received by the various tracts of land within all or part of the district, in an amount sufficient to obtain data, surveys, examinations, plans and professional services necessary to determine the cost or feasibility of the project, to purchase or lease water necessary for the project under such terms as are in compliance with section 42-222, Idaho Code, or to obtain authorization for the project. The board of directors may contract with any state or federal agency as well as any individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation or other recognized legal entity in order to obtain the data, surveys, examinations, plans or professional services that are required pursuant to this section.

§ 43-701DD. Flat rate assessments — Collection by district. — If the district has adopted a flat rate method of assessing residential lots of one (1) acre or less as authorized by section 43-701B, Idaho Code, and if the district has elected not to have that assessment collected by county officers pursuant to section 43-701D, Idaho Code, the assessment shall be collected by the district in substantially the same manner that other assessments are collected pursuant to this chapter.

§ 43-702. Notice of correction of assessments.

Within ten (10) days after the date of levying the assessment as provided in section 43-701[, Idaho Code], the secretary of the board must give notice of the time the board of directors will meet to correct assessments, by publication in a newspaper published in each of the counties comprising the district, which notice shall be published weekly for a period of two (2) weeks. The time fixed for the meeting shall not be less than two (2) weeks, nor more than five (5) weeks from the first publication of the notice. In the meantime the assessment books must remain in the office of the secretary for the inspection of all persons interested.

§ 43-703. Board of correction.

Upon the day specified in the notice required by the preceding section of the meeting, the board of directors, which is hereby constituted a board of corrections for that purpose, shall meet and continue in session, from day to day, as long as may be necessary not to exceed five (5) days, exclusive of holidays, and may make such changes in said assessment book as may be necessary to make it conform to the facts. In the event that the time set for the board of directors to meet to correct assessments should coincide with the time of the regular meeting of the board, the board of directors will in addition to their regular duties be regarded as sitting as a board of correction as above provided. Assessments levied for maintenance and operation of the district as provided in section 43-701[, Idaho Code,] may be reviewed by the board of correction upon the request of any person interested. Within five (5) days after the close of said session the secretary of the board shall have the corrected assessment book complete.

§ 43-704. Levy of assessments.

At a regular meeting between August 1 and November 8 of each year the board of directors shall levy an assessment upon the lands in said district upon the basis, and in the proportion, of the list and apportionment of benefits approved by the court as hereinbefore provided, which assessment shall be sufficient to pay principal of and interest on the outstanding bonds of the district as the same fall due. The secretary of the board must compute and enter in a separate column of the assessment book the respective sums, in dollars and cents, to be paid as an assessment on the property therein enumerated. When collected, the assessment shall be paid into the district treasury and shall constitute a special fund to be called “Bond fund of . . . . irrigation district.”

In case any assessment should be made for the purpose contemplated by a bond authorization, it shall be entered in a separate column of the assessment book in the same manner as the bond fund; and when collected shall constitute the “Construction fund of . . . . irrigation district.”

§ 43-705. Subsequent levy when first void for irregularity.

If the levy or levies of any assessment or assessments for any year or years, provided for by this chapter, on any or all the lands of the district, which remain unpaid, shall be discovered to be irregular or void because of any irregularity, informality or error in the assessment books or on account of the assessment books not having been made, completed or returned within the time required by law, or on account of any property having been listed on the assessment books without any name or with the name of any other person than that of the true owner, or in any of the various notices required by law to be published or given, or in the proceedings of any of the officers connected with the assessment, correction, levying or collection of such assessment or assessments, or in the issuance or recording of the certificates of sale therefor, another levy of such assessment or assessments may be made on such land or lands the year following the discovery of such irregularity, informality or error, in the manner provided by this chapter, and such subsequent levy or levies shall have the same force and effect as the original would have had if made in full accordance with the statutes: provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to assessments for construction or purchase of irrigation works levied otherwise than in accordance with the apportionment of benefits as confirmed by the court.

§ 43-706. Lien of assessment.

All assessments shall be liens against the property assessed from and after the first Monday in March of any year, the lien for the bonds of any series shall be a preferred lien to that of any subsequent series, except as in this title otherwise provided, and such lien shall not be removed until the assessments are paid or the property sold for the payment thereof.

§ 43-707. Payment of assessments — When delinquent.

Except in districts which have prior to such assessment entered into contracts with the United States requiring payments to the United States on or before December first of that year, on or before the first day of November the secretary must deliver the assessment book to the treasurer of the district, who shall within ten (10) days publish a notice in a newspaper published in each county in which any portion of the district may lie, that said assessments are due and payable and will become delinquent if not postmarked by or received by five o’clock p.m. on the twentieth day of December next thereafter, and also the times and places at which the payment of the assessments may be made, which notice shall be published for the period of two (2) weeks. If the twentieth day of December falls on a Saturday or Sunday, the assessment postmark or receipt deadline shall be the following Monday. The treasurer must attend at the times and places specified in the notice to receive assessments, which must be paid in lawful money of the United States: provided, that maintenance warrants of the district may be accepted as cash in the hands of the original owner for the payment of the maintenance assessments; and that matured bonds of the district and the accrued interest coupons detached from any of the bonds of the district, when presented by landowners within the irrigation district, may be accepted as cash in payment of assessments levied for bond interest and principal, and in the event that the said bonds so used are of a greater denomination than the said assessments the treasurer shall indorse upon said bond or bonds the amount necessary to pay said assessment or assessments and the date of said payment, and take a receipt from such bond holder for the amount so credited, and either such receipt describing the bond so indorsed or such indorsement shall be prima facie evidence that the said sum so indorsed has been paid on said bond or bonds. He must mark the date of payment of any assessment in the assessment book opposite the name of the person paying and give a receipt to such person, specifying the amount of the assessment and the amount paid with a description of the property assessed. Unpaid assessments for the current year are delinquent if not postmarked by or received by five o’clock p.m. on the twentieth day of December or the following Monday should the twentieth day of December fall on a Saturday or Sunday; provided, that if any person pays one-half (½) of his assessment before it becomes delinquent as aforesaid, the remaining one-half (½) shall not become delinquent until the twentieth day of June at five o’clock p.m. of each year if not received or postmarked by the same, or the following Monday should the twentieth day of June fall on a Saturday or Sunday.

Where subdivided parcels have been combined for assessment purposes as permitted by section 43-701, Idaho Code, payment of any assessment against the parcels in the combined area shall be made by the designated person or by someone acting under his authority, by a single remittance or, if payment is made in two (2) installments, then by two (2) remittances. It shall be the responsibility of the owners of the parcels within the combined area to determine their respective shares of the assessment and to provide funds to the designated person for payment of their respective shares thereof.

The treasurer of the district shall not be required to accept partial payments of any installment of an assessment.

§ 43-707A. Acceptance of personal or other nonguaranteed forms of payment.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of title 43, Idaho Code, irrigation district treasurers may accept personal or other nonguaranteed forms of payment including, but not limited to, drafts, checks, or credit or debit cards if:

The remitter identifies by legal description or assessment number the parcel for which the payment is tendered.

The amount for which the personal or other nonguaranteed form of payment is presented is the exact amount of the assessment due, including, where a delinquency exists and a tax deed has not been issued, penalties, interest and county redemption fees.

The following procedures shall be followed in processing payments by personal or other nonguaranteed forms of payment:

The assessment number of the identified parcel shall be entered on the transaction receipt.

The treasurer shall, upon request, prepare the current tax receipt or redemption certificate or both, and deliver them to the remitter. Such receipts shall be invalid, and shall so state, if payment is refused by the bank, financial institution or other entity on which it is drawn. Any personal or other nonguaranteed forms of payment upon which payment is refused will be noted in the records of the treasurer and notice of nonpayment shall be delivered to the county recorder. The notation and notice of nonpayment shall be sufficient reversal of any entries made upon the books of the district treasurer and upon the lien records of the county recorder.

Notice shall be sent to the remitter that payment has not been received, that the receipts and releases are therefore invalid and withdrawn, and that the failed payment can be redeemed by payment with United States currency or a guaranteed draft or money order in the amount of the original payment plus the additional interest accrued, plus a repetition of the county filing fees, and plus a handling charge not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Remitters choosing to pay assessments by personal or other nonguaranteed forms of payment may be responsible for any additional transaction, processing or convenience fees incurred by the irrigation district.

Full compliance with the procedures enumerated in this section shall exempt the treasurer from any personal liability for the acceptance of personal or other nonguaranteed forms of payment.

§ 43-708. Delinquent assessments — Entry on roll — Effect — Penalties for delinquencies.

On or before the second Monday of January of each year succeeding the year in which the assessments are levied the treasurer shall carry out and enter all delinquent assessments, with the penalties thereon, on the assessment roll, which entry shall be considered to be dated as of the first day of January in such succeeding year, and shall have the force and effect of a sale to the treasurer of the district as grantee in trust for the district for all lands entered upon the assessment roll upon which one-half (½) or more of the original amount of such assessments have not been paid before delinquency.

On or before the second Monday of July of such succeeding year the treasurer shall make delinquency entries as hereinbefore described for all lands entered on the assessment roll on which the remaining one-half (½) of the original amount of such assessment has not been paid before delinquency, which entries shall also be considered to be dated as of January first of such year.

The penalties required to be added on delinquent assessments shall be two per cent (2%) of the amount remaining unpaid and the treasurer shall collect such delinquent assessments with such penalty added, together with interest on the amount of such delinquent assessments at the rate of one per cent (1%) per month from said first day of January until redemption, provided that where such penalties and interest do not aggregate the sum of one dollar ($1.00) on any one assessment number, the treasurer shall not be required to collect such penalty and interest.

Provided, that if the first half (½) of such taxes be not paid prior to the said twentieth day of December, the amount of such one-half (½), plus a penalty of two per cent (2%) thereof with interest on the total at the rate of one per cent (1%) per month from the date of delinquency may be paid at any time between the third Monday of January in the year succeeding the year in which such taxes are levied and the twentieth day of June next thereafter, and, in the event of such payment, the second one-half (½) of such taxes may be paid thereafter, without penalty, at any time between the two (2) dates last above-mentioned.

§ 43-709. Delinquent assessments — Certificate of amount collected.

On or before the third Monday of January of each year succeeding the year in which the assessments were levied, the treasurer shall make his certificate to the secretary of the district showing the amount of such assessments collected into the several funds before date of delinquency and the amounts of such assessments which have become delinquent, and on or before the third Monday of July of such year the treasurer shall make a certificate to the secretary of the district showing the amounts of the second installments of such assessment which have been collected into the several funds before date of delinquency and the amounts of such second installments which have become delinquent.

§ 43-710. List of delinquency entries where redemptions not made.

On or before the fourth Monday of July of the year succeeding the year in which such assessments were levied, the treasurer shall compile a list of such delinquency entries in cases where redemptions have not been made, which list shall contain the description of the lands covered by such delinquency entries, the name of the person to whom they were assessed, together with the amount of such delinquent assessments with said penalty, numbering each entry on such list consecutively in the order such entries appear on the assessment roll, and in case such list is not in the alphabetical order of the names of the persons to whom the property was assessed, he shall supplement such list with such alphabetical index.

§ 43-711. Delinquency list — Filing of certified copy.

On or before the fourth Monday of July of the year succeeding the year in which such assessments were levied, the treasurer shall file a certified copy of the delinquency list as provided in the preceding section with the county recorder of the county in which the lands covered by the various delinquent assessments are located, which list shall be kept with the records of said county recorder in a book to be furnished by the district designated, “Record of Delinquent Assessments . . . . . Irrigation District.” Upon receiving such certified list, the recorder shall enter the same on his reception book and be entitled to a filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) therefor.

§ 43-712. Delinquent assessments — Redemption of land.

After delinquency and prior to three (3) years from the date of entry of such delinquency, and thereafter until assessment deed is issued by the treasurer, redemption of lands may be made by paying to the treasurer an amount equal to the delinquent assessments thereon, plus the penalty of two percent (2%) thereon, together with interest at the rate of one percent (1%) per month from the date of delinquency entry until paid. Upon redemption, the treasurer shall note the redemption on the delinquent list and shall issue a redemption certificate in triplicate, showing the name of the redemptioner, the amount paid in redemption, description of lands redeemed, year in which assessment was levied, and the delinquency entry number, delivering one (1) copy to the redemptioner, and in case the land being redeemed has been included in a list filed with the county recorder, he shall file one (1) copy with the county recorder of the county in which the land is located, and thereupon the county recorder shall enter the redemption opposite the corresponding entry in his record of delinquent assessments, for which service he shall be entitled to charge a fee as provided by section 31-3205, Idaho Code, which fee shall be added to the amount necessary for redemption paid by the redemptioner, and be transmitted to the county recorder by the district treasurer.

If the property on which the assessments are delinquent is not redeemed within the time hereinbefore limited, and if the assessment deed for the delinquency is made by the treasurer to the district, such property may nevertheless be redeemed by the owner thereof, or by any party in interest, up to the time a sale of the property is made by the board of directors and deed or contract for sale is delivered to the purchaser, by paying to the district treasurer the amount of all unpaid assessments levied or assessed against the said property to the time of redemption together with penalty and interest thereon and also by paying assessments for the year or years since the date of issuance of assessment deed to the district together with penalty and interest thereon, and all costs incurred for a sale of the property by the district, and the sum of two dollars ($2.00) for redemption deed from the district, and all other fees and charges for redemption otherwise prescribed by law. All assessments accruing against such property subsequent to the issuance of deed to the district shall be extended by the treasurer and be computed according to the authorized levies for the year or years to be extended. Upon payment to the district treasurer of the amounts required to be paid as herein provided, the district treasurer must issue a redemption deed to the redemptioner.

§ 43-713. Alternate system of payment in instalments of delinquent assessments of districts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of 43-712 as amended, 43-715, and 43-716[, Idaho Code,] as amended, redemption of the assessments levied for the years 1935 to 1940, inclusive, or any of them, may be made in accordance with the following formula:

If a redemptioner shall, on or before the third Monday of December, 1941, pay the oldest half year’s delinquency, plus the penalty and interest thereon, and shall also pay the first half of the assessment levied for the year 1939, the period of redemption on the remaining delinquency shall be automatically extended to the third Monday of June, 1942, and if, before the third Monday of June, 1942 he shall pay the next oldest half year’s delinquency, plus the penalty and interest thereon, and shall also pay the second half of the assessment levied for the year 1941, the period of redemption on the remaining delinquency shall be automatically extended to the third Monday of December, 1942; and thereafter, so long as the redemptioner continues to pay one-half (½) year’s delinquency and one-half (½) year’s current undelinquent assessment before the next semiannual tax delinquency date, the period of redemption on the remaining delinquency shall be automatically extended to the next following semiannual tax delinquency date. In all cases where the district treasurer has heretofore complied with the provisions of sections 43-717 and 43-718[, Idaho Code,] by giving the notice therein required, such notice need not again be given, mailed or published. This act shall not be construed to reduce the period of redemption of three (3) years now provided by sections 43-712 as amended, 43-715 and 43-716[, Idaho Code,] as amended.

§ 43-714. Restricting application of alternate system of payment.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to irrigation districts which have arranged for the collection of the district assessments by county officers under the provisions of sections 43-728 to 43-730[, Idaho Code,] inclusive.